Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4691.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 602a. (1) A driver of a motor vehicle who is given by hand, voice, emergency light, or siren a visual or audible signal by a police or conservation officer, acting in the lawful performance of his or her the police officer's or conservation officer's duty, directing the driver to bring his or her the driver's motor vehicle to a stop shall not willfully fail to obey that direction by increasing the speed of the motor vehicle, extinguishing the lights of the motor vehicle, or otherwise attempting to flee or elude the officer. This subsection does not apply unless the police or conservation officer giving the signal is in uniform and the officer's vehicle is identified as an official police or department of natural resources vehicle. (2) Except as provided in subsection (3), (4), or (5), an individual who violates subsection (1) is guilty of fourth-degree fleeing and eluding, a felony punishable by imprisonment for not less than 30 days or more than 2 years or and in addition may be ordered to pay a fine of not more than $500.00. , or both. (3) Except as provided in subsection (4) or (5), an individual who violates subsection (1) is guilty of third-degree fleeing and eluding, a felony punishable by imprisonment for not less than 1 year or more than 5 years or and in addition may be ordered to pay a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both, if 1 or more of the following circumstances apply: (a) The violation results in a collision or accident. (b) A portion of the violation occurred in an area where the speed limit is 35 miles an hour or less, whether that speed limit is posted or imposed as a matter of law. (c) The individual has a prior conviction for fourth-degree fleeing and eluding, attempted fourth-degree fleeing and eluding, or fleeing and eluding under a current or former law of this state prohibiting substantially similar conduct. (4) Except as provided in subsection (5), an individual who violates subsection (1) is guilty of second-degree fleeing and eluding, a felony punishable by imprisonment for not less than 2 years or more than 10 years or and in addition may be ordered to pay a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both, if 1 or more of the following circumstances apply: (a) The violation results in serious injury to an individual. (b) The individual has 1 or more prior convictions for first-, second-, or third-degree fleeing and eluding, attempted first-, second-, or third-degree fleeing and eluding, or fleeing and eluding under a current or former law of this state prohibiting substantially similar conduct. (c) The individual has any combination of 2 or more prior convictions for fourth-degree fleeing and eluding, attempted fourth-degree fleeing and eluding, or fleeing and eluding under a current or former law of this state prohibiting substantially similar conduct. (5) If the violation results in the death of another individual, an individual who violates subsection (1) is guilty of first-degree fleeing and eluding, a felony punishable by imprisonment for not less than 5 years or more than 15 years or and in addition may be ordered to pay a fine of not more than $10,000.00. , or both. (6) A conviction under this section does not prohibit a conviction and sentence under any other applicable provision, except section 479a(2), (3), (4), or (5) of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.479a, for conduct arising out of the same transaction. (7) As used in this section, "serious injury" means a physical injury that is not necessarily permanent, but that constitutes serious bodily disfigurement or that seriously impairs the functioning of a body organ or limb. Serious injury includes, but is not limited to, 1 or more of the following: (a) Loss of a limb or use of a limb. (b) Loss of a hand, foot, finger, or thumb or use of a hand, foot, finger, or thumb. (c) Loss of an eye or ear or use of an eye or ear. (d) Loss or substantial impairment of a bodily function. (e) Serious visible disfigurement. (f) A comatose state that lasts for more than 3 days. (g) Measurable brain damage or mental impairment. (h) A skull fracture or other serious bone fracture. (i) Subdural hemorrhage or hematoma. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 4690 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.